Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1180.
do enact as follows:AB1180,11Section 1. 103.465 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1180,2,32103.465 (title) Restrictive covenants in employment contracts; 3prohibitions.AB1180,24Section 2. 103.465 of the statutes is renumbered 103.465 (1) and amended to 5read:AB1180,2,146103.465 (1) Covenants in employment contracts not to compete. A 7covenant by an assistant, servant, employee, or agent not to compete with his or her 8employer or principal during the term of the employment or agency, or after the 9termination of that employment or agency, within a specified territory and during a 10specified time is lawful and enforceable only if the restrictions imposed are 11reasonably necessary for the protection of the employer or principal. Any covenant, 12described in this section, imposing subsection, that imposes an unreasonable 13restraint on trade is illegal, void, and unenforceable even as to any part of the 14covenant or performance that would be a reasonable restraint on trade.AB1180,315Section 3. 103.465 (2) and (3) of the statutes are created to read:AB1180,2,2016103.465 (2) Nonsolicitation provisions in employment contract after 17termination of employment or agency prohibited. (a) In this subsection, 18“solicitation” means recruiting an assistant, servant, employee, or agent of an 19employer or principal to work for or provide agent services for a different employer 20or principal.AB1180,3,221(b) Any provision in an employment contract that prohibits solicitation by a 22former assistant, servant, employee, or agent after the termination of the 1employment or agency of such assistant, servant, employee, or agent imposes an 2unreasonable restraint on trade and is illegal, void, and unenforceable.AB1180,3,113(3) Notice posted. Each employer and principal shall post, in one or more 4conspicuous places where notices to assistants, servants, employees, and agents are 5customarily posted, and in a conspicuous place on the employer’s or principal’s 6website if the employer or principal maintains a website, a notice in a form 7approved by the department that explains that an employment contract provision 8that prohibits a former assistant, servant, employee, or agent from recruiting an 9assistant, servant, employee, or agent of the employer or principal after 10termination of employment or agency is an unreasonable restraint on trade and is 11illegal, void, and unenforceable.AB1180,412Section 4. Initial applicability.AB1180,3,1513(1) Nonsolicitation provision in employment contracts. This act first 14applies to a nonsolicitation provision in an employment contract that is entered 15into, extended, modified, or renewed on the effective date of this subsection.AB1180,3,1616